Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-109
Report regarding
lottery revenue.

The Department of Revenue shall, at the conclusion of each calendar quarter, provide
to the most populous city within the county in which the Nebraska
State Fair is held written notification
of the amount estimated by the department to equal ten percent of the lottery
revenue collected during the
calendar quarter to be transferred to the Nebraska State Fair
Support and Improvement Cash Fund. If
the state fair is scheduled to be held in a different county from that in
which the most recent state fair was held, the written notification required
by this section shall be made to the most populous city within the county
in which the state fair is scheduled to be held beginning with the written
notification made at the conclusion of the first calendar quarter during the
calendar year in which the state fair is held or scheduled to be held in such
county. The department shall provide a copy of the written notification
to the Department of Administrative Services.

Laws 2005, LB 426, § 5;

Laws 2009, LB224, § 2.